Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB116.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this chapter:
(1) (a) "Assault weapon" means a:
1. Semiautomatic rifle that has an ability to accept a detachable
magazine and has at least one (1) of the following characteristics:
a. A folding or telescoping stock;
b. A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of
the weapon;
c. A second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the
nontrigger hand;
d. A bayonet mount;
e. A flash suppressor, muzzle break, muzzle compensator, or
threaded barrel designed to accommodate a flash suppressor,
muzzle break, or muzzle compensator; or
f. A grenade launcher;
2. Semiautomatic shotgun that has at least one (1) of the following
characteristics:
a. A folding or telescoping stock;
b. A second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the
nontrigger hand;
c. A fixed magazine capacity in excess of seven (7) rounds; or
d. An ability to accept a detachable magazine;
3. Semiautomatic pistol that has an ability to accept a detachable
magazine and has at least one (1) of the following characteristics:
Page 1 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
a. A folding or telescoping stock;
b. A second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the
nontrigger hand;
c. Capacity to accept an ammunition magazine that attaches to the
pistol outside of the pistol grip;
d. A threaded barrel capable of accepting a barrel extender, flash
suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer;
e. A shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely encircles,
the barrel and that permits the shooter to hold the firearm with
the nontrigger hand without being burned; or
f. A manufactured weight of fifty (50) ounces or more when the
pistol is unloaded;
4. Semiautomatic version of an automatic rifle, shotgun, or firearm; or
5. Revolving cylinder shotgun.
(b) "Assault weapon" does not include:
1. Any rifle, shotgun, or pistol that:
a. Is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action;
b. Has been rendered permanently inoperable; or
c. Is an antique firearm as defined in 18 U.S.C. sec. 921;
2. A semiautomatic rifle that cannot accept a detachable magazine that
holds more than five (5) rounds of ammunition; or
3. A semiautomatic shotgun that cannot hold more than five (5) rounds
of ammunition in a fixed or detachable magazine;
(2) "Large capacity ammunition feeding device" means a magazine, belt, drum, feed
strip, or similar device that has a capacity of, or that can be readily restored or
converted to accept, more than seven (7) rounds of ammunition, but does not
include an attached tubular device designed to accept, and capable of operating
Page 2 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
only with, .22 caliber rimfire ammunition or a feeding device that is a curio or
relic. To qualify as a curio or relic feeding device under this subsection, it must
be a feeding device that:
(a) Was manufactured at least fifty (50) years prior to the current date, not
including replicas thereof;
(b) Is only capable of being used exclusively in a firearm, rifle, or shotgun that
was manufactured at least fifty (50) years prior to the current date, not
including replicas thereof;
(c) Is possessed by an individual who is not prohibited by state or federal law
from possessing a firearm; and
(d) Is registered with the Department of Kentucky State Police pursuant to
Section 5 of this Act; and
(3) "Seller of ammunition" means any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or
company that engages in the business of purchasing, selling, or keeping
ammunition.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In addition to any other requirement of state or federal law, all sales, exchanges,
or transfers of firearms shall be conducted in accordance with this section unless
the sale, exchange, or transfer is:
(a) Conducted by a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, or licensed
dealer, as those terms are defined in 18 U.S.C. secs. 921 and 922, when the
sale, exchange, or transfer is conducted pursuant to that person’s federal
firearms license; or
(b) Between spouses, parents, children, and stepchildren in the same immediate
family.
(2) Before any sale, exchange, or transfer pursuant to this section, a national instant
Page 3 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
criminal background check shall be completed by a dealer who consents to
conduct a check, and upon completion of the background check, the dealer shall
complete a form developed by the Department of Kentucky State Police, and
available for download through the department's website, that identifies and
confirms that the check was performed.
(3) In addition to any sales log-keeping requirements created under Section 5 of this
Act or any other requirement of state or federal law, all dealers shall maintain a
record of transactions and background checks conducted pursuant to this section,
and the records shall be maintained on the premises identified and described in
the dealer's license, and shall be available at all reasonable hours for inspection
by any peace officer acting within the scope of his or her duties.
(4) A dealer may require that any background check conducted pursuant to this
section be subject to a fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10) per transaction.
(5) Any record produced pursuant to this section and any transmission of the record
to any government agency shall not be considered a public record for purposes of
the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Any owner or other person lawfully in possession of a firearm who suffers
the loss or theft of the firearm or any seller of ammunition who suffers a
loss or theft of ammunition shall report the facts and circumstances of the
loss or theft to an appropriate law enforcement agency within twenty-four
(24) hours of the discovery of the loss or theft.
(b) The report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall contain, if
known, the caliber, make, model, manufacturer’s name and serial number,
if any, and any other distinguishing number or identification mark on the
firearm, or the make, type, and caliber of the ammunition.
Page 4 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
(2) A law enforcement agency that receives a report pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section shall enter the reported information into the National Crime Information
Center database.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "safe storage depository":
(a) Means a safe or other secure container which, when locked, cannot be
opened without the key, combination, or other unlocking mechanism and
can prevent an unauthorized person from obtaining access to and
possession of its contents; and
(b) Does not include the glove compartment of a motor vehicle unless the glove
compartment can be manually locked.
(2) A person who owns or is a custodian of a firearm shall not store or otherwise
leave the firearm out of his or her immediate possession or control without
having first securely locked the firearm in an appropriate safe storage depository
or rendered it incapable of being fired by use of a gun-locking device appropriate
to that weapon.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate an
administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for the
licensure of persons to possess a handgun in the Commonwealth of
Kentucky. The administrative regulation shall prohibit the possession of a
handgun by a person in the Commonwealth unless the person holds a
license or falls within an exemption that the Department of Kentucky State
Police may create in the administrative regulation. The license shall be
available to persons who are at least twenty-one (21) years old or have been
Page 5 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States, meet the
eligibility criteria established by the department, and are not otherwise
prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a handgun.
(b) The Department of Kentucky State Police may establish a fee for
applications for a license sufficient to cover the costs of administering the
program.
(c) Licenses issued under this subsection shall be effective for no longer than
five (5) years.
(d) Persons receiving a license under this subsection shall be given the option
of whether the license shall be public or private. If the license is private, the
record shall be available to all state law enforcement agencies but shall not
be a public record under the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to
61.884.
(2) (a) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate an
administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for the
registration of handguns in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The
administrative regulation shall prohibit the possession of an unregistered
handgun by a person in the Commonwealth unless the handgun falls within
an exemption that the Department of Kentucky State Police may create in
the administrative regulation.
(b) The administrative regulation shall require that the handgun's registration
information be updated upon any transfer of ownership of the handgun.
(c) The Department of Kentucky State Police may establish a fee for
applications for a license sufficient to cover the costs of administering the
program.
(d) Persons registering a handgun under this subsection shall be given the
option of deciding whether the registration shall be public or private. If the
Page 6 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
registration is private, the record shall not be a public record under the
Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(3) (a) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate an
administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for the
licensure of persons to possess an assault weapon or a large capacity
ammunition feeding device in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The
administrative regulation shall prohibit the possession of an assault weapon
or a large capacity ammunition feeding device by a person in the
Commonwealth unless the person holds a license or falls within an
exemption that the Department of Kentucky State Police may create in the
administrative regulation. The license shall be available to persons who are
at least twenty-one (21) years old or have been honorably discharged from
the Armed Forces of the United States, meet the eligibility criteria
established by the department, and are not otherwise prohibited by state or
federal law from possessing an assault weapon or a large capacity
ammunition feeding device.
(b) The Department of Kentucky State Police may establish a fee for
applications for a license sufficient to cover the costs of administering the
program.
(c) Licenses issued under this subsection shall be effective for no longer than
five (5) years.
(d) Persons receiving a license under this subsection shall be given the option
of deciding whether the license shall be public or private. If the license is
private, the record shall not be a public record under the Kentucky Open
Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(4) (a) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate an
administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for the
Page 7 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
registration of assault weapons and large capacity ammunition feeding
devices in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The administrative regulation
shall prohibit the possession of an unregistered assault weapon or a large
capacity ammunition feeding device by a person in Kentucky unless the
assault weapon or large capacity ammunition feeding device falls within an
exemption that the Department of Kentucky State Police may create in the
administrative regulation.
(b) The administrative regulation shall require that the assault weapon or large
capacity ammunition feeding device registration information be updated
upon any transfer of ownership of the assault weapon or large capacity
ammunition feeding device.
(c) The Department of Kentucky State Police may establish a fee for
applications for a license sufficient to cover the costs of administering the
program.
(d) Persons registering an assault weapon or large capacity ammunition
feeding device under this subsection shall be given the option of deciding
whether the registration shall be public or private. If the registration is
private, the record shall not be a public record under the Kentucky Open
Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(5) (a) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate an
administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A establishing
a sales log-keeping requirement for firearms dealers and sellers of
ammunition operating in the Commonwealth that sell handguns,
ammunition for handguns, assault weapons, ammunition for assault
weapons, large capacity ammunition feeding devices, or ammunition for
large capacity ammunition feeding devices.
(b) The administrative regulation may require the:
Page 8 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
1. Log be kept in electronic format and transmitted to the department at
regular intervals; and
2. Department of Kentucky State Police or the dealer or seller to require
the purchaser to produce a government-issued photo identification,
which the dealer or seller shall record in the log.
(c) By July 1, 2027, the log shall be required to operate in real time and shall
query the records of the department prior to the completion of a sale,
including sales, exchanges, or transfers pursuant to Section 2 of this Act, to
determine whether the purchaser has a current, valid license to possess that
type of firearm or a license for the type of firearm for which the
ammunition is being purchased.
(d) Records kept in the sales log shall be open to inspection by any peace officer
acting on official business.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 527 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal purchase or transfer of a weapon when knowing
that:
(a) He or she is prohibited by law from possessing a firearm because of a prior
criminal conviction or is otherwise ineligible to lawfully possess a firearm
under state or federal law, the person purchases a firearm from another
person;
(b) It is unlawful for another person to possess a firearm, he or she purchases a
firearm for, on behalf of, or for the use of that other person; or
(c) Another person is prohibited by law from possessing a firearm because of a
prior criminal conviction or is otherwise ineligible to lawfully possess a
firearm under state or federal law, he or she transfers a firearm to that
other person.
Page 9 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
(2) Criminal purchase or transfer of a weapon is a Class D felony.
Section 7. KRS 237.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who:
(a) Violates any of the provisions of KRS 237.030 to 237.050; or
(b) Possesses an assault weapon or a large capacity ammunition feeding device
in violation of the administrative regulations promulgated under Section 5
of this Act;
shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 237.030 to 237.050, and in
so doing uses any destructive device or booby trap device to avoid detection by law
enforcement or other government personnel or to avoid theft or detection by any
other person, of any controlled substance as set forth in KRS Chapter 218A and
held in violation of KRS 218A.140, shall be guilty of a Class C felony.
(3) Any person who:
(a) Violates subsection (1) of Section 3 of this Act;
(b) Violates Section 4 of this Act;
(c) Knowingly violates Section 2 of this Act; or
(d) Possesses a handgun in violation of the administrative regulations
promulgated under Section 5 of this Act;
shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) Any firearms dealer or seller of ammunition who violates the administrative
regulations promulgated under subsection (5) of Section 5 of this Act shall be
guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
Section 8. KRS 395.250 is amended to read as follows:
[It shall be the duty of ]A personal representative of a decedent shall[to] return an
inventory in duplicate within two (2) months from the time of qualifying as the personal
representative[such], to the clerk's office of the court in which he or she qualified, the
Page 10 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
original of which shall be recorded by the clerk and the duplicate shall be mailed by the
clerk to the commissioner[secretary] of the Department of Revenue. The inventory shall
include a particularized description of every firearm that is part of the estate, and if a
firearm is included, a copy of the inventory shall be provided by the clerk to the
Department of Kentucky State Police. Copies from the record of the inventory or
appraisement shall be prima facie evidence for or against the personal[such]
representative.
Section 9. KRS 403.735 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Prior to or at a hearing on a petition for an order of protection:
(a) The court may obtain the respondent's Kentucky criminal and protective order
history and utilize that information to assess what relief and which sanctions
may protect against danger to the petitioner or other person for whom
protection is being sought, with the information so obtained being provided to
the parties in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure; and
(b) If the petitioner or respondent is a minor, the court shall inquire whether the
parties attend school in the same school system to assist the court in imposing
conditions in the order that have the least disruption in the administration of
education to the parties while providing appropriate protection to the
petitioner.
(2) (a) If the adverse party is not present at the hearing ordered pursuant to KRS
403.730 and has not been served, a previously issued emergency protective
order shall remain in place, and the court shall direct the issuance of a new
summons for a hearing set not more than fourteen (14) days in the future. If
service has not been made on the adverse party before that hearing or a
subsequent hearing, the emergency protective order shall remain in place, and
the court shall continue the hearing and issue a new summons with a new date
and time for the hearing to occur, which shall be within fourteen (14) days of
Page 11 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
the originally scheduled date for the continued hearing. The court shall repeat
the process of continuing the hearing and reissuing a new summons until the
adverse party is served in advance of the scheduled hearing. If service has not
been made on the respondent at least seventy-two (72) hours prior to the
scheduled hearing, the court may continue the hearing no more than fourteen
(14) days in the future. In issuing the summons, the court shall simultaneously
transmit a copy of the summons or notice of its issuance and provisions to the
petitioner. Upon the request of the petitioner, the court may excuse the
petitioner from future court appearances until the respondent has been served.
(b) The provisions of this section permitting the continuance of an emergency
protective order shall be limited to six (6) months from the issuance of the
emergency protective order. If the respondent has not been served within that
period, the order shall be rescinded without prejudice. Prior to the expiration
of the emergency protective order, the court shall provide notice to the
petitioner stating that, if the petitioner does not file a new petition, the order
shall be rescinded without prejudice.
(c) In issuing an order of protection or in considering any requested
modifications to or violations of an existing order of protection, the court
shall make a determination of whether there is a substantial risk that the
respondent may use or threaten to use a firearm unlawfully against the
person for whose protection the order of protection is issued. If the court
finds that a substantial risk exists, the court shall order that the respondent
be prohibited from possessing a firearm and shall order him or her to
surrender any firearms owned or possessed by the respondent to the sheriff
of the county where the firearm is located. The sheriff shall impound the
weapon until the:
1. Prohibition is lifted;
Page 12 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
2. Order expires; or
3. Respondent directs the transfer of the weapon to a person lawfully
allowed to possess the firearm.
(d) Upon the surrender of all firearms by the respondent in compliance with the
court's order under paragraph (c) of this subsection, the sheriff taking
possession of the firearms shall issue a receipt identifying the firearms that
have been surrendered and provide a copy of the receipt to the respondent.
The sheriff shall file the original receipt with the court and shall ensure that
the sheriff's office retains a copy of the receipt.
Section 10. KRS 456.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Prior to or at a hearing on a petition for an interpersonal protective order:
(a) The court may obtain the respondent's Kentucky criminal and protective order
history and utilize that information to assess what relief and which sanctions
may protect against danger to the petitioner or other person for whom
protection is being sought, with the information so obtained being provided to
the parties in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure; and
(b) If the petitioner or respondent is a minor, the court shall inquire whether the
parties attend school in the same school system to assist the court in imposing
conditions in the order that have the least disruption in the administration of
education to the parties while providing appropriate protection to the
petitioner.
(2) (a) If the adverse party is not present at the hearing ordered pursuant to KRS
456.040 and has not been served, a previously issued temporary interpersonal
protective order shall remain in place, and the court shall direct the issuance
of a new summons for a hearing set not more than fourteen (14) days in the
future. If service has not been made on the adverse party before that hearing
or a subsequent hearing, the temporary interpersonal protective order shall
Page 13 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
remain in place, and the court shall continue the hearing and issue a new
summons with a new date and time for the hearing to occur, which shall be
within fourteen (14) days of the originally scheduled date for the continued
hearing. The court shall repeat the process of continuing the hearing and
reissuing a new summons until the adverse party is served in advance of the
scheduled hearing. If service has not been made on the respondent at least
seventy-two (72) hours prior to the scheduled hearing, the court may continue
the hearing no more than fourteen (14) days in the future. In issuing the
summons, the court shall simultaneously transmit a copy of the summons or
notice of its issuance and provisions to the petitioner. Upon the request of the
petitioner, the court may excuse the petitioner from future court appearances
until the respondent has been served.
(b) The provisions of this section permitting the continuance of an interpersonal
protective order shall be limited to six (6) months from the issuance of the
temporary interpersonal protective order. If the respondent has not been
served within that period, the order shall be rescinded without prejudice. Prior
to the expiration of the temporary interpersonal protective order, the court
shall provide notice to the petitioner stating that, if the petitioner does not file
a new petition, the order shall be rescinded without prejudice.
(c) In issuing an interpersonal protective order or in considering any requested
modifications to or violations of an existing interpersonal protective order,
the court shall make a determination of whether there is a substantial risk
that the respondent may use or threaten to use a firearm unlawfully against
the person for whose protection the interpersonal protective order is issued.
If the court finds that a substantial risk exists, the court shall order that the
respondent be prohibited from possessing a firearm and shall order him or
her to surrender any firearms owned or possessed by the respondent to the
Page 14 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
sheriff of the county where the firearm is located. The sheriff shall impound
the weapon until the:
1. Prohibition is lifted;
2. Order expires; or
3. Respondent directs the transfer of the weapon to a person lawfully
allowed to possess the firearm.
(d) Upon the surrender of all firearms by the respondent in compliance with the
court's order under paragraph (c) of this subsection, the sheriff taking
possession of the firearms shall issue a receipt identifying the firearms that
have been surrendered and provide a copy of the receipt to the respondent.
The sheriff shall file the original receipt with the court and shall ensure that
the sheriff's office retains a copy of the receipt.
Section 11. KRS 504.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a defendant is found not guilty by reason of insanity, the court shall:
(a) Conduct an involuntary hospitalization proceeding under KRS Chapter 202A
or 202B; and
(b) Order in open court that the defendant be prohibited from possessing a
firearm and shall also order him or her to surrender any firearms owned or
possessed by the defendant to the sheriff of the county where the firearm is
located. The sheriff shall impound the weapon until the:
1. Order expires or is lifted;
2. Conviction is altered, amended, or vacated;
3. Defendant is granted a pardon; or
4. Respondent directs the transfer of the weapon to a person lawfully
allowed to possess the firearm.
Upon the surrender of all firearms by the defendant in compliance with the
court's order under this paragraph, the sheriff taking possession of the
Page 15 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
firearms shall issue a receipt identifying the firearms that have been
surrendered and provide a copy of the receipt to the defendant. The sheriff
shall file the original receipt with the court and shall ensure that the
sheriff's office retains a copy of the receipt.
(2) To facilitate the procedure established in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the court
may order the detention of the defendant for a period of ten (10) days to allow for
proceedings to be initiated against the defendant for examination and possible
detention pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 202A or 202B.
Section 12. KRS 237.104 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person, unit of government, or governmental organization shall not, during a
period of disaster or emergency as specified in KRS Chapter 39A or at any other
time, have the right to revoke, suspend, limit the use of, or otherwise impair the
validity of the right of any person to purchase, transfer, loan, own, possess, carry, or
use a firearm, firearm part, ammunition, ammunition component, or any deadly
weapon or dangerous instrument.
(2) A[No] person, unit of government, or governmental organization shall not, during a
period of disaster or emergency as specified in KRS Chapter 39A or at any other
time, take, seize, confiscate, or impound a firearm, firearm part, ammunition,
ammunition component, or any deadly weapon or dangerous instrument from any
person.
(3) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to the taking of an item specified in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section from a person who is:
(a) Forbidden to possess a firearm pursuant to KRS 527.040 or Section 5, 9, 10,
11, or 17 of this Act;
(b) Forbidden to possess a firearm pursuant to federal law;
(c) Violating KRS 527.020;
(d) In possession of a stolen firearm;
Page 16 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
(e) Using a firearm in the commission of a separate criminal offense; or
(f) Using a firearm or other weapon in the commission of an offense under KRS
Chapter 150.
Section 13. KRS 506.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal facilitation when, acting with knowledge that another
person is committing or intends to commit a crime, he or she engages in conduct
which knowingly provides such person with means or opportunity for the
commission of the crime and which in fact aids such person to commit the crime,
including making available, selling, exchanging, giving, or disposing of a
firearm.
(2) Criminal facilitation is a:
(a) Class D felony when the crime facilitated is a Class A or Class B felony or
capital offense;
(b) Class A misdemeanor when the crime facilitated is a Class C or Class D
felony;
(c) Class B misdemeanor when the crime facilitated is a misdemeanor.
Section 14. KRS 508.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of assault in the second degree when he or she:
(a) Intentionally[He intentionally] causes serious physical injury to another
person;[ or ]
(b) Intentionally[He intentionally] causes physical injury to another person by
means of a deadly weapon or a dangerous instrument;[ or]
(c) Wantonly[He wantonly] causes serious physical injury to another person by
means of a deadly weapon or a dangerous instrument; or
(d) Wantonly causes physical injury to a minor by intentionally discharging a
firearm.
(2) Assault in the second degree is a Class C felony.
Page 17 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
Section 15. KRS 527.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possession of a firearm by a convicted felon when he or she
possesses, manufactures, or transports a firearm when he or she has been convicted
of a felony, as defined by the laws of the jurisdiction in which he or she was
convicted, in any state or federal court and has not:
(a) Been granted a full pardon by the Governor or by the President of the United
States; or
(b) Been granted relief by the Attorney General of the United States[ Secretary of
the Treasury] pursuant to the[ Federal] Gun Control Act of 1968, 18 U.S.C.
sec. 921 et seq., as amended.
(2) (a) Possession of a firearm by a convicted felon is a Class D felony unless the
firearm possessed is a handgun in which case it is a Class C felony.
(b) If a felon is convicted of a criminal offense other than possession of a firearm
by a convicted felon, and he or she possessed a firearm in commission of that
offense, then the felon shall be penalized for violating this section one (1)
class more severely if it is a second or subsequent violation of this section.
(c) Sentences for violation of this section shall be served consecutively to any
other felony sentence imposed on the offender.
(3) [The provisions of ]This section shall apply to any youthful offender convicted of a
felony offense under the laws of this Commonwealth. The exceptions contained in
KRS 527.100 prohibiting possession of a handgun by a minor shall not apply to this
section.
(4) The provisions of this section with respect to handguns, shall apply only to persons
convicted after January 1, 1975, and with respect to other firearms, to persons
convicted after July 15, 1994.
Section 16. KRS 527.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful possession of a weapon on school property when he
Page 18 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
or she knowingly deposits, possesses, or carries, whether openly or concealed, for
purposes other than instructional or school-sanctioned ceremonial purposes, or the
purposes permitted in subsection (3) of this section, any firearm or other deadly
weapon, destructive device, or booby trap device in any postsecondary education
facility, public or private school building or bus, on any public or private school
campus, grounds, recreation area, athletic field, or any other property owned, used,
or operated by any institution of postsecondary education, board of education,
school, board of trustees, regents, or directors for the administration of any public
or private educational institution.[ The provisions of this section shall not apply to
institutions of postsecondary or higher education.]
(2) Each chief administrator of a public or private school shall display about the school
in prominent locations, including[,] but not limited to[,] sports arenas, gymnasiums,
stadiums, and cafeterias, a sign at least six (6) inches high and fourteen (14) inches
wide stating:
UNLAWFUL POSSESSION OF A WEAPON ON SCHOOL
PROPERTY IN KENTUCKY IS A FELONY PUNISHABLE
BY A MAXIMUM OF FIVE (5) YEARS IN PRISON AND A
TEN THOUSAND DOLLAR ($10,000) FINE.
Failure to post the sign shall not relieve any person of liability under this section.
(3) The provisions of this section prohibiting the unlawful possession of a weapon on
school property shall not apply to:
(a) An adult who is not a pupil of any secondary school and who possesses a
firearm, if the firearm is contained within a vehicle operated by the adult and
is not removed from the vehicle, except for a purpose permitted herein, or
brandished by the adult, or by any other person acting with expressed or
implied consent of the adult, while the vehicle is on school property;
(b) Any pupils who are members of the reserve officers training corps or pupils
Page 19 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
enrolled in a course of instruction or members of a school club or team, to the
extent they are required to carry arms or weapons in the discharge of their
official class or team duties;
(c) Any peace officer or police officer authorized to carry a concealed weapon
pursuant to KRS 527.020;
(d) Persons employed by the Armed Forces of the United States or members of
the National Guard or militia when required in the discharge of their official
duties to carry arms or weapons;
(e) Civil officers of the United States in the discharge of their official duties.
[Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed as to allow any person to
carry a concealed weapon into a public or private elementary or secondary
school building;
(f) Any other persons, including[,] but not limited to[,] exhibitors of historical
displays, who have been authorized to carry a firearm by the board of
education or board of trustees of the public or private institution;
(g) A person hunting during the lawful hunting season on lands owned by any
public or private educational institution and designated as open to hunting by
the board of education or board of trustees of the educational institution;
(h) A person possessing unloaded hunting weapons while traversing the grounds
of any public or private educational institution for the purpose of gaining
access to public or private lands open to hunting with the intent to hunt on the
public or private lands, unless the lands of the educational institution are
posted prohibiting the entry; or
(i) A person possessing guns or knives when conducting or attending a "gun and
knife show" when the program has been approved by the board of education
or board of trustees of the educational institution.
(4) Unlawful possession of a weapon on school property is a Class D felony.
Page 20 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
Section 17. KRS 532.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a capital offense, he or she shall have his or her
punishment fixed at death, or at a term of imprisonment for life without benefit of
probation or parole, or at a term of imprisonment for life without benefit of
probation or parole until he or she has served a minimum of twenty-five (25) years
of his or her sentence, or to a sentence of life, or to a term of not less than twenty
(20) years nor more than fifty (50) years.
(2) When a person is convicted of a Class A felony, he or she shall have his
punishment fixed at imprisonment in accordance with KRS 532.060.
(3) When a person is convicted of an offense other than a capital offense or Class A
felony, he or she shall have his or her punishment fixed at:
(a) A term of imprisonment authorized by this chapter;[ or]
(b) A fine authorized by KRS Chapter 534; or
(c) Both imprisonment and a fine unless precluded by the provisions of KRS
Chapter 534.
(4) (a) When a person is convicted of any capital offense, felony offense, or offense
where the defendant is found guilty but mentally ill, the judge pronouncing
sentence shall order in open court that the defendant be prohibited from
possessing a firearm and shall order him or her to surrender any firearms
owned or possessed by the defendant to the sheriff of the county where the
firearm is located, who shall impound the weapon until the prohibition is
lifted, the conviction is altered, amended, or vacated, the defendant is
granted a pardon, or the respondent directs the transfer of the weapon to a
person lawfully allowed to possess the firearm.
(b) Upon the surrender of all firearms by the defendant in compliance with the
court's order under this subsection, the sheriff taking possession of the
firearms shall issue a receipt identifying the firearms that have been
Page 21 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
surrendered and provide a copy of the receipt to the defendant. The sheriff
shall file the original receipt with the court and shall ensure that the
sheriff's office retains a copy of the receipt.
(5) In all cases in which the death penalty may be authorized the judge shall instruct the
jury in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. The instructions shall state,
subject to the aggravating and mitigating limitations and requirements of KRS
532.025, that the jury may recommend upon a conviction for a capital offense a
sentence of death, or at a term of imprisonment for life without benefit of probation
or parole, or a term of imprisonment for life without benefit of probation or parole
until the defendant has served a minimum of twenty-five (25) years of his or her
sentence, or a sentence of life, or to a term of not less than twenty (20) years nor
more than fifty (50) years.
Section 18. KRS 532.025 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon conviction of a defendant in cases where the death penalty may be
imposed, a hearing shall be conducted. In such hearing, the judge shall hear
additional evidence in extenuation, mitigation, and aggravation of
punishment, including the record of any prior criminal convictions and pleas
of guilty or pleas of nolo contendere of the defendant, or the absence of any
prior conviction and pleas; provided, however, that only such evidence in
aggravation as the state has made known to the defendant prior to his or her
trial shall be admissible. Subject to the Kentucky Rules of Evidence, juvenile
court records of adjudications of guilt of a child for an offense that would be a
felony if committed by an adult shall be admissible in court at any time the
child is tried as an adult, or after the child becomes an adult, at any
subsequent criminal trial relating to that same person. Juvenile court records
made available pursuant to this section may be used for impeachment
purposes during a criminal trial and may be used during the sentencing phase
Page 22 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
of a criminal trial; however, the fact that a juvenile has been adjudicated
delinquent of an offense that would be a felony if the child had been an adult
shall not be used in finding the child to be a persistent felony offender based
upon that adjudication. Release of the child's treatment, medical, mental, or
psychological records is prohibited unless presented as evidence in Circuit
Court. Release of any records resulting from the child's prior abuse and
neglect under Title IV-E or IV-B of the Federal Social Security Act is also
prohibited. The judge shall also hear argument by the defendant or his or her
counsel and the prosecuting attorney, as provided by law, regarding the
punishment to be imposed. The prosecuting attorney shall open and the
defendant shall conclude the argument. In cases in which the death penalty
may be imposed, the judge when sitting without a jury shall follow the
additional procedure provided in subsection (2) of this section. Upon the
conclusion of the evidence and arguments, the judge shall impose the sentence
or shall recess the trial for the purpose of taking the sentence within the limits
prescribed by law. If the trial court is reversed on appeal because of error only
in the presentence hearing, the new trial which may be ordered shall apply
only to the issue of punishment.
(b) In all cases in which the death penalty may be imposed and which are tried by
a jury, upon a return of a verdict of guilty by the jury, the court shall resume
the trial and conduct a presentence hearing before the jury. Such hearing shall
be conducted in the same manner as presentence hearings conducted before
the judge as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, including the record
of any prior criminal convictions and pleas of guilty or pleas of nolo
contendere of the defendant. Upon the conclusion of the evidence and
arguments, the judge shall give the jury appropriate instructions, and the jury
shall retire to determine whether any mitigating or aggravating circumstances,
Page 23 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
as defined in subsection (2) of this section, exist and to recommend a sentence
for the defendant. Upon the findings of the jury, the judge shall fix a sentence
within the limits prescribed by law.
(2) In all cases of offenses for which the death penalty may be authorized, the judge
shall consider, or include in the[his or her] instructions to the jury for it to consider,
any mitigating circumstances or aggravating circumstances otherwise authorized by
law and any of the following statutory aggravating or mitigating circumstances
which may be supported by the evidence:
(a) Aggravating circumstances:
1. The offense of murder or kidnapping was committed by a person with a
prior record of conviction for a capital offense, or the offense of murder
was committed by a person who has a substantial history of serious
assaultive criminal convictions;
2. The offense of murder or kidnapping was committed while the offender
was engaged in the commission of arson in the first degree, robbery in
the first degree, burglary in the first degree, rape in the first degree, or
sodomy in the first degree;
3. The offender by his or her act of murder, armed robbery, or kidnapping
knowingly created a great risk of death to more than one (1) person in a
public place by means of a weapon of mass destruction, weapon, or
other device which would normally be hazardous to the lives of more
than one (1) person;
4. The offender committed the offense of murder for himself, herself, or
another, for the purpose of receiving money or any other thing of
monetary value, or for other profit;
5. The offense of murder was committed by a person who was a prisoner
and the victim was a prison employee engaged at the time of the act in
Page 24 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
the performance of his or her duties;
6. The offender's act or acts of killing were intentional and resulted in
multiple deaths;
7. The offender's act of killing was intentional and the victim was:
a. A state or local public official; or
b. A first responder, as defined in KRS 507.070;
8. The offender murdered the victim when an emergency protective order
or a domestic violence order was in effect, or when any other order
designed to protect the victim from the offender, such as an order issued
as a condition of a bond, conditional release, probation, parole, or
pretrial diversion, was in effect; and
9. The offender's act of killing was intentional and resulted in the death of
a child under twelve (12) years old.
(b) Mitigating circumstances:
1. The defendant has no significant history of prior criminal activity;
2. The capital offense was committed while the defendant was under the
influence of extreme mental or emotional disturbance even though the
influence of extreme mental or emotional disturbance is not sufficient to
constitute a defense to the crime;
3. The victim was a participant in the defendant's criminal conduct or
consented to the criminal act;
4. The capital offense was committed under circumstances which the
defendant believed to provide a moral justification or extenuation for his
or her conduct even though the circumstances which the defendant
believed to provide a moral justification or extenuation for his or her
conduct are not sufficient to constitute a defense to the crime;
5. The defendant was an accomplice in a capital offense committed by
Page 25 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
another person and his or her participation in the capital offense was
relatively minor;
6. The defendant acted under duress or under the domination of another
person even though the duress or the domination of another person is not
sufficient to constitute a defense to the crime;
7. At the time of the capital offense, the capacity of the defendant to
appreciate the criminality of his or her conduct to the requirements of
law was impaired as a result of mental illness or an intellectual disability
or intoxication even though the impairment of the capacity of the
defendant to appreciate the criminality of his or her conduct or to
conform the conduct to the requirements of law is insufficient to
constitute a defense to the crime; and
8. The youth of the defendant at the time of the crime.
(3) The instructions as determined by the trial judge to be warranted by the evidence or
as required by KRS 532.030(5)[(4)] shall be given in charge and in writing to the
jury for its deliberation. The jury, if its verdict be a recommendation of death, or
imprisonment for life without benefit of probation or parole, or imprisonment for
life without benefit of probation or parole until the defendant has served a minimum
of twenty-five (25) years of his or her sentence, shall designate in writing, signed by
the foreman of the jury, the aggravating circumstance or circumstances which it
found beyond a reasonable doubt. In nonjury cases, the judge shall make such
designation. In all cases unless at least one (1) of the statutory aggravating
circumstances enumerated in subsection (2) of this section is so found, the death
penalty, or imprisonment for life without benefit of probation or parole, or the
sentence to imprisonment for life without benefit of probation or parole until the
defendant has served a minimum of twenty-five (25) years of his or her sentence,
shall not be imposed.
Page 26 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
Section 19. KRS 237.115 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 527.020, the provisions of[nothing contained in] KRS
237.109 or 237.110 shall not be construed to limit, restrict, or prohibit in any
manner[ the right of a college, university, or any postsecondary education facility,
including technical schools and community colleges, to control the possession of
deadly weapons on any property owned or controlled by them or] the right of a unit
of state, city, county, urban-county government, or charter county government to
prohibit the carrying of concealed deadly weapons in that portion of a building
actually owned, leased, or occupied by that unit of government.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 527.020, the legislative body of a state, city, county, or
urban-county government may, by statute, administrative regulation, or ordinance,
prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed deadly weapons in that portion of a
building owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of government. That portion of a
building in which the carrying of concealed deadly weapons is prohibited or limited
shall be clearly identified by signs posted at the entrance to the restricted area. The
statute or ordinance shall exempt any building used for public housing by private
persons, highway rest areas, firing ranges, and private dwellings owned, leased, or
controlled by that unit of government from any restriction on the carrying or
possession of deadly weapons. The statute, administrative regulation, or ordinance
shall not specify any criminal penalty for its violation but may specify that persons
violating the statute or ordinance may be denied entrance to the building, ordered to
leave the building, and if employees of the unit of government, be subject to
employee disciplinary measures for violation of the provisions of the statute or
ordinance.[ The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to be a violation of
KRS 65.870 if the requirements of this section are followed. The provisions of]
This section shall not apply to any other unit of government.
(3) Unless otherwise specifically provided by the Kentucky Revised Statutes or
Page 27 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
applicable federal law, a[no] criminal penalty shall not attach to carrying a
concealed firearm or other deadly weapon at any location at which an unconcealed
firearm or other deadly weapon may be constitutionally carried.
Section 20. KRS 65.1591 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Peer support communication" means any oral or written communication
made in the course of, or application for, a peer support counseling session or
any communication by a peer support participant regarding the contents of a
peer support counseling session to another peer support specialist, staff
member of a peer support counseling program, or the supervisor of a peer
support specialist;
(b) "Peer support counseling program" means a program provided by a public
agency to provide counseling services from a peer support specialist to a
public safety employee;
(c) "Peer support counseling session" means any counseling formally provided
through a peer support counseling program between a peer support specialist
and one (1) or more public safety employees;
(d) "Peer support participant" means a public safety employee who receives
counseling services from a peer support specialist;
(e) "Peer support specialist" means a public safety employee designated by the
public agency to provide peer support counseling who has received training in
both peer support counseling and in providing emotional and moral support to
public safety employees who have been in or exposed to an emotionally
traumatic experience in the course of employment;
(f) "Public agency" means a city, county, urban-county government, charter
county government, consolidated local government, unified local
government, special district, local or regional public or quasi-public agency,
Page 28 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
board, commission, department, or public corporation[has the same meaning
as the entities listed in KRS 65.870 (1)]; and
(g) "Public safety employee" means an individual employed by a public agency
who:
1. Serves as a police officer as defined by KRS 15.420(2)(a)1.;
2. Serves in a position that is primarily engaged in firefighting activities,
whether paid or unpaid;
3. Serves as a certified telecommunicator as provided by KRS 15.560 to
15.565; or
4. Is licensed to provide emergency medical services as provided by KRS
Chapter 311A.
(2) Any public agency may create and design a peer support counseling program to
provide support to public safety employees who have been in or exposed to an
emotionally traumatic experience in the course of employment.
(3) The content of any peer support communication shall remain confidential and shall
not be disclosed to any individual who was not party to the peer support counseling
session or peer support communication, except when the peer support
communication contains:
(a) An explicit threat of suicide by a participant in which the participant shares an
intent to die by suicide, a plan to carry out a suicide attempt, or discloses the
means by which the participant intends to carry out a suicide attempt. This
paragraph shall not apply to any peer support communication where the
participant solely shares that the participant is experiencing suicidal thoughts;
(b) An explicit threat by a participant of imminent and serious physical and
bodily harm or death to a clearly identified or reasonably identifiable victim;
(c) Information related to the abuse or neglect of a child or an older adult or
vulnerable individual that is required by law to be reported;
Page 29 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 209
(d) An admission of criminal conduct; or
(e) Information which is required by law to be disclosed.
(4) A peer support participant shall hold a privilege from disclosure of any peer support
communication in any disciplinary proceeding or any civil or criminal proceeding
unless it contains information exempted under subsection (3)(b), (c), (d), or (e) of
this section. Under this privilege, the peer support communication shall be subject
to the same protections as any counselor-client privilege provided under the
Kentucky Rules of Evidence in any criminal or civil proceeding.
(5) Nothing in subsection (3) or (4) of this section shall be interpreted or construed to
prohibit:
(a) The use of or sharing by the public agency of anonymous data for research,
statistical analysis, or educational purposes;
(b) The disclosure of an observation by an employee of the public agency of a
peer support participant outside of a peer support counseling session and not
contained in peer support communication; or
(c) The disclosure of knowledge of a law enforcement officer of the public
agency about a peer support participant not gained from peer support
communication.
Section 21. The following KRS section is repealed:
65.870 Local firearms control ordinances prohibited -- Exemption from immunity --
Declaratory and injunctive relief.
Section 22. Section 5 of this Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Section 23. Whereas the safety of the citizens of the Commonwealth is of
primary importance, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 to 4 and 6 to 21 of
this Act take effect upon their passage and approval by the Governor or upon their
otherwise becoming a law.
Page 30 of 30
XXXX 10/24/2025 12:43 PM Jacketed